California, session 20252026, AB1576.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4751 of the Labor Code is amended to read:4751. (a) If an employee who is permanently partially disabled receives a subsequent compensable injury resulting in additional permanent partial disability so that the degree of disability caused by the combination of both disabilities is greater than that which would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone, and the combined effect of the last injury and the previous disability or impairment is a permanent disability equal to 70 percent or more of total, the employee shall be paid in addition to the compensation due under this code for the permanent partial disability caused by the last injury compensation for the remainder of the combined permanent disability existing after the last injury as provided in this article; provided, that either of the following is satisfied:(1) The previous disability or impairment affected a hand, an arm, a foot, a leg, or an eye, and the permanent disability resulting from the subsequent injury affects the opposite and corresponding member, that latter permanent disability, when considered alone and without regard to, or adjustment for, the occupation or age of the employee, is equal to 5 percent or more of total.(2) The permanent disability resulting from the subsequent injury, when considered alone and without regard to to, or adjustment for for, the occupation or the age of the employee, is equal to 35 percent or more of total.(b) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), the term “permanent disability” in relation to subsequent compensable injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2005, and prior to January 1, 2013, shall be measured by the whole person impairment rating, also referred to as the impairment standard, as determined in accordance with the American Medical Association Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment, 5th Edition, after adjustment for diminished future earning capacity and without regard to, or adjustment for, the occupation or age of the employee.(c) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), the term “permanent disability” in relation to subsequent compensable injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2013, shall be measured by the whole person impairment rating, also referred to as the impairment standard, as determined in accordance with the American Medical Association Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment, 5th edition, Edition, after multiplication by the adjustment factor referred to in subdivision (b) of Section 4660.1 and without regard to, or adjustment for, the occupation or age of the employee.(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) are declarative of existing law.SEC. 2. Section 4753.5 of the Labor Code is amended to read:4753.5. In any hearing, investigation, or proceeding, the state shall be represented by the Attorney General, or the attorneys of the Department of Industrial Relations, as appointed by the Director of Industrial Relations. Expenses incident to representation, including costs for investigation, medical examinations, other expert reports, fees for witnesses, and other necessary and proper expenses, but excluding the salary of any of the Attorney General’s deputies, shall be reimbursed from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund. No witness fees or fees for medical or medical-legal services shall exceed those fees for the same services prescribed by the appeals board or the administrative director by rule or regulation. Reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be in addition to, and in augmentation of, any other appropriations made or funds available for the use or support of the legal representation.SEC. 3. Section 4754 of the Labor Code is amended to read:4754. The appeals board shall fix and award the amounts of special additional compensation to be paid under this article, and shall direct the Director of Industrial Relations, as trustee of the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund, to pay the additional compensation so awarded.SEC. 4. Section 4754.1 is added to the Labor Code, to read:4754.1. (a) This section shall apply to compensable subsequent injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2027.(b) For purposes of determining eligibility for, and the amount of an award of, special additional compensation to be paid under this article, the existence of a prior permanent partial disability that existed at the time of the subsequent compensable injury shall be determined by substantial evidence, based on medical records, testimony, or other evidence, that the prior permanent partial disability predated the subsequent compensable injury and that the prior permanent partial disability resulted in loss of earnings, interfered with work activities of the employee, or otherwise impacted the ability of the employee to perform work activities or activities of daily living.(c)For purposes of determining the existence of a prior permanent partial disability that existed at the time of the subsequent compensable injury pursuant to subdivision (b), the following conditions shall not be considered as preexisting labor disabling disabilities for determining eligibility for benefits pursuant to this article:(1)Acid reflux, including gastroesophageal reflux disease.(2)Allergies.(3)Arthritis.(4)Asthma.(5)Diabetes.(6)Headaches.(7)Hypertension.(8)Sexual dysfunction.(9)Sleep apnea.(d)(c) Medical-legal evidence in a proceeding filed for compensation pursuant to this article may only be obtained in the manner set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4060) of Chapter 7 of Part 1 of this Division. division.(e)(d) The administrative director shall create and maintain a database of qualified medical evaluator physicians who have the necessary training and expertise to perform evaluations for claims filed pursuant to Section 4751. This database shall be used by the medical director to fulfill requests for a panel of qualified medical evaluators filed pursuant to subdivision (d). (c).(f)(e) The Director of Industrial Relations shall have authority to issue regulations as necessary for the implementation and orderly and effective administration of this article.SEC. 5.Section 4754.2 is added to the Labor Code, to read:4754.2.For all subsequent compensable injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2027, the limitations period within which an employee may file an application for special additional compensation pursuant to this article shall be five years from the date of the subsequent compensable injury, or one year from the date that the level of permanent disability arising from the subsequent compensable injury is determined by the appeals board, whichever occurs later.SEC. 6.SEC. 5. Section 4755 of the Labor Code is amended to read:4755. (a) The Director of Industrial Relations, as trustee of the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund, may draw from the State Treasury out of the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund for the purposes specified in Section 4751, without at the time presenting vouchers and itemized statements, a sum not to exceed in the aggregate fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), to be used as a cash revolving fund. The revolving fund shall be deposited in any banks and under any conditions as the Department of Finance determines. The Controller shall draw their warrants in favor of the Director of Industrial Relations, as trustee of the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund, for the amounts so withdrawn and the Treasurer shall pay these warrants.(b) Expenditures made from the revolving fund in payments on claims for any additional compensation and for adjusting services are exempted from the operation of Section 16003 of the Government Code. Reimbursement of the revolving fund for these expenditures shall be made upon presentation to the Controller of an abstract or statement of the expenditures. The abstract or statement shall be in any form as the Controller requires.(c) The director shall assign claims adjustment services and legal representation services respecting matters concerning subsequent injuries. The director or their representative may make these service assignments within the department, or they may contract for these services with the State Compensation Insurance Fund, for a fee in addition to that authorized by Section 4754, except insofar as these matters might conflict with the interests of the State Compensation Insurance Fund. The administrative costs associated with these services shall be reimbursed from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund, except when a budget impasse requires advances as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 62.5. To the extent permitted by state law, the director may contract for audits or reports of services under this section.